dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Br Y 68
SFX Br ти л .
SFX Br ти ла .
SFX Br ти ло .
SFX Br ти ли .
SFX Br здити жджу .
SFX Br ти м .
SFX Br ти ш .
SFX Br ти 0 .
SFX Br ти мо .
SFX Br и е .
SFX Br ити ет .
SFX Br ти х .
SFX Br ти ше .
SFX Br ти хмо .
SFX Br ти сте .
SFX Br ти ху .
SFX Br ити ечи .
SFX Br ити еча .
SFX Br ити ече .
SFX Br ти мы .
SFX Br ти мого .
SFX Br ти мому .
SFX Br ти мым .
SFX Br ти мом .
SFX Br ти мо .
SFX Br ти ма .
SFX Br ти му .
SFX Br ти мој .
SFX Br ти моју .
SFX Br ти ми .
SFX Br ти ме .
SFX Br ти мых .
SFX Br ти мым .
SFX Br ти мыми .
SFX Br ти вши .
SFX Br ти вшего .
SFX Br ти вшему .
SFX Br ти вшим .
SFX Br ти вшем .
SFX Br ти вших .
SFX Br ти вшими .
SFX Br ти вша .
SFX Br ти вшу .
SFX Br ти вшеј .
SFX Br ти вшеју .
SFX Br ти вше .
SFX Br здити жджены .
SFX Br здити ждженого .
SFX Br здити ждженому .
SFX Br здити ждженым .
SFX Br здити ждженом .
SFX Br здити жджени .
SFX Br здити жджене .
SFX Br здити ждженых .
SFX Br здити жджеными .
SFX Br здити жджена .
SFX Br здити жджену .
SFX Br здити ждженој .
SFX Br здити ждженоју .
SFX Br здити жджено .
SFX Br здити ждженје/xPxE .
SFX Br здити ждженја/xPxE .
SFX Br здити ждженју/xPxE .
SFX Br здити ждженјем/xPxE .
SFX Br здити жджениј/xPxE .
SFX Br здити ждженјам/xPxE .
SFX Br здити ждженјами/xPxE .
SFX Br здити ждженјах/xPxE .

SFX Bs Y 72
SFX Bs сти дл .
SFX Bs сти дла .
SFX Bs сти дло .
SFX Bs сти дли .
SFX Bs сти ду .
SFX Bs сти дем .
SFX Bs сти деш .
SFX Bs сти де .
SFX Bs сти демо .
SFX Bs сти дете .
SFX Bs сти дут .
SFX Bs сти дех .
SFX Bs сти деше .
SFX Bs сти дехмо .
SFX Bs сти десте .
SFX Bs сти деху .
SFX Bs сти ди .
SFX Bs сти димо .
SFX Bs сти дите .
SFX Bs сти дучи .
SFX Bs сти дучего .
SFX Bs сти дучему .
SFX Bs сти дучим .
SFX Bs сти дучем .
SFX Bs сти дучих .
SFX Bs сти дучими .
SFX Bs сти дуча .
SFX Bs сти дучу .
SFX Bs сти дучеј .
SFX Bs сти дучеју .
SFX Bs сти дуче .
SFX Bs сти домы .
SFX Bs сти домого .
SFX Bs сти домому .
SFX Bs сти домым .
SFX Bs сти домом .
SFX Bs сти домо .
SFX Bs сти дома .
SFX Bs сти дому .
SFX Bs сти домој .
SFX Bs сти домоју .
SFX Bs сти доми .
SFX Bs сти доме .
SFX Bs сти домых .
SFX Bs сти домым .
SFX Bs сти домыми .
SFX Bs сти домо .
SFX Bs сти дши .
SFX Bs сти дша .
SFX Bs сти дше .
SFX Bs сти дены .
SFX Bs сти деного .
SFX Bs сти деному .
SFX Bs сти деным .
SFX Bs сти деном .
SFX Bs сти дени .
SFX Bs сти дене .
SFX Bs сти деных .
SFX Bs сти деными .
SFX Bs сти дена .
SFX Bs сти дену .
SFX Bs сти деној .
SFX Bs сти деноју .
SFX Bs сти дено .
SFX Bs сти денје/xPxE .
SFX Bs сти денја/xPxE .
SFX Bs сти денју/xPxE .
SFX Bs сти денјем/xPxE .
SFX Bs сти дениј/xPxE .
SFX Bs сти денјам/xPxE .
SFX Bs сти денјами/xPxE .
SFX Bs сти денјах/xPxE .

SFX Bt Y 9
SFX Bt 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bt е е/xPxBxO .
SFX Bt е а/xPxE .
SFX Bt е 0 .
SFX Bt е у/xPxE .
SFX Bt е ах/xPxE .
SFX Bt е ам/xPxE .
SFX Bt 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Bt е ами/xPxE .

SFX Bu Y 37
SFX Bu ти л .
SFX Bu ти ла .
SFX Bu ти ло .
SFX Bu ти ли .
SFX Bu ти ју .
SFX Bu ти м .
SFX Bu ти јеш .
SFX Bu ти ш .
SFX Bu ти је .
SFX Bu ти 0 .
SFX Bu ти јемо .
SFX Bu ти мо .
SFX Bu ти јете .
SFX Bu и е .
SFX Bu ти јут .
SFX Bu ти х .
SFX Bu ти ше .
SFX Bu ти хмо .
SFX Bu ти сте .
SFX Bu ти ху .
SFX Bu ти ј .
SFX Bu ти јмо .
SFX Bu ти јте .
SFX Bu ти јучи .
SFX Bu ти јуча .
SFX Bu ти јуче .
SFX Bu ти јемы .
SFX Bu ти јема .
SFX Bu ти мы .
SFX Bu ти ма .
SFX Bu ти вши .
SFX Bu ти вша .
SFX Bu ти вше .
SFX Bu ти ны .
SFX Bu ти на .
SFX Bu ти но .
SFX Bu ти нје .

SFX Bv Y 68
SFX Bv ти л .
SFX Bv ти ла .
SFX Bv ти ло .
SFX Bv ти ли .
SFX Bv тити чу .
SFX Bv ти м .
SFX Bv ти ш .
SFX Bv ти 0 .
SFX Bv ти мо .
SFX Bv и е .
SFX Bv ити ет .
SFX Bv ти х .
SFX Bv ти ше .
SFX Bv ти хмо .
SFX Bv ти сте .
SFX Bv ти ху .
SFX Bv ити ечи .
SFX Bv ити еча .
SFX Bv ити ече .
SFX Bv ти мы .
SFX Bv ти мого .
SFX Bv ти мому .
SFX Bv ти мым .
SFX Bv ти мом .
SFX Bv ти мо .
SFX Bv ти ма .
SFX Bv ти му .
SFX Bv ти мој .
SFX Bv ти моју .
SFX Bv ти ми .
SFX Bv ти ме .
SFX Bv ти мых .
SFX Bv ти мым .
SFX Bv ти мыми .
SFX Bv ти вши .
SFX Bv ти вшего .
SFX Bv ти вшему .
SFX Bv ти вшим .
SFX Bv ти вшем .
SFX Bv ти вших .
SFX Bv ти вшими .
SFX Bv ти вша .
SFX Bv ти вшу .
SFX Bv ти вшеј .
SFX Bv ти вшеју .
SFX Bv ти вше .
SFX Bv тити чены .
SFX Bv тити ченого .
SFX Bv тити ченому .
SFX Bv тити ченым .
SFX Bv тити ченом .
SFX Bv тити чени .
SFX Bv тити чене .
SFX Bv тити ченых .
SFX Bv тити чеными .
SFX Bv тити чена .
SFX Bv тити чену .
SFX Bv тити ченој .
SFX Bv тити ченоју .
SFX Bv тити чено .
SFX Bv тити ченје/xPxE .
SFX Bv тити ченја/xPxE .
SFX Bv тити ченју/xPxE .
SFX Bv тити ченјем/xPxE .
SFX Bv тити чениј/xPxE .
SFX Bv тити ченјам/xPxE .
SFX Bv тити ченјами/xPxE .
SFX Bv тити ченјах/xPxE .

SFX Bw Y 68
SFX Bw ти л .
SFX Bw ти ла .
SFX Bw ти ло .
SFX Bw ти ли .
SFX Bw єти жу .
SFX Bw єти им .
SFX Bw єти иш .
SFX Bw єти и .
SFX Bw єти имо .
SFX Bw єти ите .
SFX Bw єти ет .
SFX Bw ти х .
SFX Bw ти ше .
SFX Bw ти хмо .
SFX Bw ти сте .
SFX Bw ти ху .
SFX Bw єти ечи .
SFX Bw єти еча .
SFX Bw єти ече .
SFX Bw єти имы .
SFX Bw єти имого .
SFX Bw єти имому .
SFX Bw єти имым .
SFX Bw єти имом .
SFX Bw єти имо .
SFX Bw єти има .
SFX Bw єти иму .
SFX Bw єти имој .
SFX Bw єти имоју .
SFX Bw єти ими .
SFX Bw єти име .
SFX Bw єти имых .
SFX Bw єти имым .
SFX Bw єти имыми .
SFX Bw ти вши .
SFX Bw ти вшего .
SFX Bw ти вшему .
SFX Bw ти вшим .
SFX Bw ти вшем .
SFX Bw ти вших .
SFX Bw ти вшими .
SFX Bw ти вша .
SFX Bw ти вшу .
SFX Bw ти вшеј .
SFX Bw ти вшеју .
SFX Bw ти вше .
SFX Bw ти ны .
SFX Bw ти ного .
SFX Bw ти ному .
SFX Bw ти ным .
SFX Bw ти ном .
SFX Bw ти ни .
SFX Bw ти не .
SFX Bw ти ных .
SFX Bw ти ными .
SFX Bw ти на .
SFX Bw ти ну .
SFX Bw ти ној .
SFX Bw ти ноју .
SFX Bw ти но .
SFX Bw ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Bw ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Bw ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Bw ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Bw ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Bw ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Bw ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Bw ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX Bx Y 72
SFX Bx ти л .
SFX Bx ти ла .
SFX Bx ти ло .
SFX Bx ти ли .
SFX Bx ти у .
SFX Bx ти ем .
SFX Bx ти еш .
SFX Bx ти е .
SFX Bx ти емо .
SFX Bx ти ете .
SFX Bx ти ут .
SFX Bx ти ех .
SFX Bx ти еше .
SFX Bx ти ехмо .
SFX Bx ти есте .
SFX Bx ти еху .
SFX Bx ти и .
SFX Bx ти имо .
SFX Bx ти ите .
SFX Bx ти учи .
SFX Bx ти учего .
SFX Bx ти учему .
SFX Bx ти учим .
SFX Bx ти учем .
SFX Bx ти учих .
SFX Bx ти учими .
SFX Bx ти уча .
SFX Bx ти учу .
SFX Bx ти учеј .
SFX Bx ти учеју .
SFX Bx ти уче .
SFX Bx ти омы .
SFX Bx ти омого .
SFX Bx ти омому .
SFX Bx ти омым .
SFX Bx ти омом .
SFX Bx ти омо .
SFX Bx ти ома .
SFX Bx ти ому .
SFX Bx ти омој .
SFX Bx ти омоју .
SFX Bx ти оми .
SFX Bx ти оме .
SFX Bx ти омых .
SFX Bx ти омым .
SFX Bx ти омыми .
SFX Bx ти омо .
SFX Bx ти ши .
SFX Bx ти ша .
SFX Bx ти ше .
SFX Bx ти ены .
SFX Bx ти еного .
SFX Bx ти еному .
SFX Bx ти еным .
SFX Bx ти еном .
SFX Bx ти ени .
SFX Bx ти ене .
SFX Bx ти еных .
SFX Bx ти еными .
SFX Bx ти ена .
SFX Bx ти ену .
SFX Bx ти еној .
SFX Bx ти еноју .
SFX Bx ти ено .
SFX Bx ти енје/xPxE .
SFX Bx ти енја/xPxE .
SFX Bx ти енју/xPxE .
SFX Bx ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX Bx ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX Bx ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX Bx ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX Bx ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX By Y 39
SFX By ти л .
SFX By ти ла .
SFX By ти ло .
SFX By ти ли .
SFX By ти х .
SFX By ти с .
SFX By ти 0 .
SFX By ти хмо .
SFX By ти сте .
SFX By ыти єх .
SFX By ыти єше .
SFX By ыти єхмо .
SFX By ыти єсте .
SFX By ыти єху .
SFX By ыти уду .
SFX By ыти удеш .
SFX By ыти уде .
SFX By ыти удемо .
SFX By ыти удете .
SFX By ыти удут .
SFX By ыти уд .
SFX By ыти удмо .
SFX By ыти удте .
SFX By ти вши .
SFX By ти вшего .
SFX By ти вшему .
SFX By ти вшим .
SFX By ти вшем .
SFX By ти вших .
SFX By ти вшими .
SFX By ти вша .
SFX By ти вшу .
SFX By ти вшеј .
SFX By ти вшеју .
SFX By ти вше .
SFX By и ы .
SFX By и а .
SFX By и о .
SFX By и је .
