dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
јездити/Br
извести/Bs
солнце/Bt
владати/Bu
владєти/Bu
захватити/Bv
прдєти/Bw
клатити/Bv
влєзти/Bx
быти/By
чудовишче/Bt
красти/Bs
скратити/Bv
посветити/Bv
грызти/Bx
класти/Bs
украсти/Bs
напасти/Bs
ненавидєти/Bw
посєтити/Bv
схватити/Bv
упасти/Bs
одвратити/Bv
нести/Bx
сєдєти/Bw
светити/Bv
јајце/Bt
везти/Bx
вратити/Bv
сбоже/Bt
гледєти/Bw
разпасти/Bs
платити/Bv
видєти/Bw
обогатити/Bv
лежишче/Bt
быти/By
игришче/Bt
лєзти/Bx
заплатити/Bv
срдце/Bt
повратити/Bv
обратити/Bv
принести/Bx
тратити/Bv
изтратити/Bv
привезти/Bx
забезпаметити/Bv
ввести/Bs
обгледєти/Bw
донести/Bx
прєвести/Bs
ступенишче/Bt
потрести/Bx
трести/Bx
прєгледєти/Bw
быти/By
тајнишче/Bt
пропасти/Bs
похытити/Bv
сєдалишче/Bt
одплатити/Bv
однести/Bx
одвести/Bs
пасти/Bs
подгледєти/Bw
прєнести/Bx
прєвезти/Bx
прєдвидєти/Bw
прєдплатити/Bv
снести/Bx
внести/Bx
изнести/Bx
разнести/Bx
ввезти/Bx
провести/Bs
развести/Bx
одвезти/Bx
извезти/Bx
огледєти/Bw
увидєти/Bw
угрызти/Bx
одгрызти/Bx
спасти/Bs
одпасти/Bs
просвєтити/Bv
надгледєти/Bw
угледєти/Bw
разгледєти/Bw
вратити/Bv
догледєти/Bw
домче/Bt
довезти/Bx
изплатити/Bv
колјце/Bt
быти/By
полномочје/Bt
прєзвишче/Bt
пригледєти/Bw
пристанишче/Bt
произвести/Bs
разгледєти/Bw
снабдєти/Bw
срєдишче/Bt
утратити/Bv
шчитити/Bv
затрести/Bx
трести/Bx
вести/Bs
вгледєти/Bw
зашчитити/Bv
осамотити/Bv
себесмртити/Bv
осватити/Bv
сватити/Bv
летишче/Bt
училишче/Bt
разтратити/Bv
быти/By
чтити/Bv
гледишче/Bt
гонишче/Bt
гробишче/Bt
използти/Bx
крижишче/Bt
мокришче/Bt
мравишче/Bt
надглавишче/Bt
обхватити/Bv
огнишче/Bt
подножишче/Bt
ползти/Bx
поползти/Bx
прести/Bs
прести/Bs
становишче/Bt
стрєлишче/Bt
топишче/Bt
усести/Bs
возвести/Bs
јездити/Br
завратити/Bv
земједєлишче/Bt
крутити/Bv
крутити/Bv
складишче/Bt
трговишче/Bt
возбогатити/Bv
жилишче/Bt
бдєти/Bw
ложе/Bt
ложишче/Bt
мутити/Bv
нести/Bx
разнести/Bx
смутити/Bv
усмртити/Bv
вознести/Bx
паствишче/Bt
припасти/Bs
спасти/Bx
впасти/Bs
посести/Bs
ссести/Bs
утратити/Bv
засвєтити/Bv
развести/Bs
вєче/Bt
возвратити/Bv
вратити/Bv
извратити/Bv
обратити/Bv
обратити/Bv
прєобратити/Bv
осиротити/Bv
сиротишче/Bt
быти/By
однести/Bx
быти/By
провртити/Bv
запасти/Bs
убєжишче/Bt
бости/Bs
браздити/Br
гнєздити/Br
гнојишче/Bt
градишче/Bt
красти/Bs
кротити/Bv
ленишче/Bt
лєтовишче/Bt
леговишче/Bt
ловишче/Bt
млатити/Bv
нанести/Bx
насытити/Bv
навести/Bs
обгрызти/Bx
објездити/Br
обнести/Bx
обвести/Bs
оглушети/Bu
окотити/Bv
опасти/Bs
спрести/Bs
осамотити/Bv
осести/Bs
осветити/Bv
освєтити/Bv
позлатити/Bv
разгрызти/Bx
разкрутити/Bv
размлатити/Bv
развезти/Bx
бости/Bs
привести/Bs
укротити/Bv
смлатити/Bv
парковишче/Bt
стојишче/Bt
златити/Bv
нрєстилишче/Bt
сытити/Bv
примєтити/Bv
обкрасти/Bs
разкрутити/Bv
котити/Bv
доползти/Bx
потити/Bv
спотити/Bv
изтрести/Bx
отрести/Bx
возтрести/Bx
быти/By
блјудце/Bt
светилишче/Bt
довести/Bs
завидєти/Bw
воплотити/Bv
прєсести/Bs
везти/Bx
скрывалишче/Bt
посмєшишче/Bt
клатити/Bv
пригледєти/Bw
изпасти/Bs
зрєлишче/Bt
